Washington statutes.
RCW 15.86.140

Brand name materials list—Fees.

(1) The department is authorized to set and collect fees for application for registration, renewal of registration, inspections, and sampling for the brand name materials list. Collected fees are subject to provisions specified in RCW 15.86.070. The department may increase by rule fees established in this section as necessary to cover costs of provision of services.

(2)(a) The application fee for registration of a pesticide, spray adjuvant, processing aid, livestock production aid, or postharvest material is:

(i) Five hundred dollars per material for an initial registration; and

(ii) Three hundred dollars per material for renewing a registration.

(b) The application fee for registration of a fertilizer, soil amendment, organic waste-derived material, compost, animal manure, or crop production aid is:

(i) Four hundred dollars per material for an initial registration; and

(ii) Two hundred dollars per material for renewing a registration.

(3)(a) Renewal applications postmarked after October 31st must include, in addition to the renewal fee, a late fee of:

(i) One hundred dollars per material for applications postmarked after October 31st;

(ii) Two hundred dollars per material for applications postmarked after November 30th; and

(iii) Three hundred dollars per material for applications postmarked after December 31st.

(b) Renewal applications received after February 2nd will not be accepted, and applicants must reapply as new applicants.

(4) Inspections and any additional visit that must be arranged must be billed at forty dollars per hour plus travel costs and mileage, charged at the rate established by the office of financial management.

(5) Chemical analysis of material samples, if required for registration or requested by the applicant, must be billed at a rate established by the laboratory services division of the department of agriculture or at cost for analyses performed by another laboratory.

(6) Requests for expedited reviews may be submitted and, if approved, must be billed at forty dollars per hour.

(7) The department may assess compliance with an international or additional organic standard for materials registered on the brand name materials list as approved for use under the national organic program. Requests for additional assessments of materials approved under the national organic program must be billed at a rate of one hundred dollars per product for each standard.

[ 2010 c 109 s 10.]